North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article V Finance

§ 1. No capitation tax to be levied.

No poll or capitation tax shall be levied by the General Assembly or by any county, city or town, or other taxing unit.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1.

§ 2. State and local taxation.

Power of taxation.— The power of taxation shall be exercised in a just and equitable manner, for public purposes only, and shall never be surrendered, suspended, or contracted away.

Classification.— Only the General Assembly shall have the power to classify property for taxation, which power shall be exercised only on a State-wide basis and shall not be delegated. No class of property shall be taxed except by uniform rule, and every classification shall be made by general law uniformly applicable in every county, city and town, and other unit of local government.

Exemptions.— Property belonging to the State, counties, and municipal corporations shall be exempt from taxation. The General Assembly may exempt cemeteries and property held for educational, scientific, literary, cultural, charitable, or religious purposes, and, to a value not exceeding $300, any personal property. The General Assembly may exempt from taxation not exceeding $1,000 in value of property held and used as the place of residence of the owner. Every exemption shall be on a State-wide basis and shall be made by general law uniformly applicable in every county, city and town, and other unit of local government. No taxing authority other than the General Assembly may grant exemptions, and the General Assembly shall not delegate the powers accorded to it by this subsection.

Special tax areas.— Subject to the limitations imposed by Section 4, the General Assembly may enact general laws authorizing the governing body of any county, city, or town to define territorial areas and to levy taxes within those areas, in addition to those levied throughout the county, city, or town, in order to finance, provide, or maintain services, facilities, and functions in addition to or to a greater extent than those financed, provided, or maintained for the entire county, city, or town.

Purposes of property tax.— The General Assembly shall not authorize any county, city or town, special district, or other unit of local government to levy taxes on property, except for purposes authorized by general law uniformly applicable throughout the State, unless the tax is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the unit who vote thereon.

Income tax.— The rate of tax on incomes shall not in any case exceed seven percent, and there shall be allowed personal exemptions and deductions so that only net incomes are taxed.

Contracts.— The General Assembly may enact laws whereby the State, any county, city or town, and any other public corporation may contract with and appropriate money to any person, association, or corporation for the accomplishment of public purposes only.

History.

1969, c. 872, s. 1; c. 1200, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1; 2018-119, s. 1.

Cross references.

For provisions authorizing counties and cities to contract with and appropriate money to private entities in order to carry out any authorized public purpose, see

G.S. 153A-449

and 160A-20.1, respectively.

As to taxation of improvements on qualifying brownfields, see

G.S. 105-277.13

.

History Note.

The provisions of subsections (1), (2) and (6) of this section are similar to those of Art. V, § 3, Const. 1868, as last amended in 1962. The provisions of subsection (3) are similar to those of Art. V, § 5, Const. 1868, as last amended in 1962.

§ 3. Limitations upon the increase of State debt.

Authorized purposes; two-thirds limitation.— The General Assembly shall have no power to contract debts secured by a pledge of the faith and credit of the State, unless approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote thereon, except for the following purposes:

to fund or refund a valid existing debt;

to supply an unforeseen deficiency in the revenue;

to borrow in anticipation of the collection of taxes due and payable within the current fiscal year to an amount not exceeding 50 per cent of such taxes;

to suppress riots or insurrections, or to repel invasions;

to meet emergencies immediately threatening the public health or safety, as conclusively determined in writing by the Governor;

for any other lawful purpose, to the extent of two-thirds of the amount by which the State’s outstanding indebtedness shall have been reduced during the next preceding biennium.

(2)

Gift or loan of credit regulated.—

The General Assembly shall have no power to give or lend the credit of the State in aid of any person, association, or corporation, except a corporation in which the State has a controlling interest, unless the subject is submitted to a direct vote of the people of the State, and is approved by a majority of the qualified voters who vote thereon.

(3)

Definitions.—

A debt is incurred within the meaning of this Section when the State borrows money. A pledge of the faith and credit within the meaning of this Section is a pledge of the taxing power. A loan of credit within the meaning of this Section occurs when the State exchanges its obligations with or in any way guarantees the debts of an individual, association, or private corporation.

(4)

Certain debts barred.—

The General Assembly shall never assume or pay any debt or obligation, express or implied, incurred in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States. Neither shall the General Assembly assume or pay any debt or bond incurred or issued by authority of the Convention of 1868, the special session of the General Assembly of 1868, or the General Assembly of 1868-69 and 1869-70, unless the subject is submitted to the people of the State and is approved by a majority of all the qualified voters at a referendum held for that sole purpose.

(5)

Outstanding debt.—

Except as provided in subsection (4), nothing in this Section shall be construed to invalidate or impair the obligation of any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness outstanding or authorized for issue as of July 1, 1973.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; 1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to limitations upon the increase of local government debt, see N.C. Const., Art. V, § 4.

History Note.

The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section are similar to those of Art. V, § 4, Const. 1868, as amended in 1924 and 1936, and the provisions of subsection (4) are similar to those of Art. I, § 6, Const. 1868, as amended in 1872-1873 and 1880.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on taxation and revenue bonds to finance low-income housing, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 830 (1971).

For article on the need to reform North Carolina property tax law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 675 (1981).

For comment, “The States, Balanced Budgets, and Fundamental Shifts in Federalism,” see 82 N.C.L. Rev. 1195 (2004).

For article, “The People versus Corporate Welfare: North Carolina’s Forsaken Opportunity to Reverse Perversion of the Commerce Clause and to Reinvigorate the Public Purpose Doctrine,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 381 (2011).

§ 4. Limitations upon the increase of local government debt.

Regulation of borrowing and debt.— The General Assembly shall enact general laws relating to the borrowing of money secured by a pledge of the faith and credit and the contracting of other debts by counties, cities and towns, special districts, and other units, authorities, and agencies of local government.

Authorized purposes; two-thirds limitation.— The General Assembly shall have no power to authorize any county, city or town, special district, or other unit of local government to contract debts secured by a pledge of its faith and credit unless approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the unit who vote thereon, except for the following purposes:

to fund or refund a valid existing debt;

to supply an unforeseen deficiency in the revenue;

to borrow in anticipation of the collection of taxes due and payable within the current fiscal year to an amount not exceeding 50 per cent of such taxes;

to suppress riots or insurrections;

to meet emergencies immediately threatening the public health or safety, as conclusively determined in writing by the Governor;

for purposes authorized by general laws uniformly applicable throughout the State, to the extent of two-thirds of the amount by which the unit’s outstanding indebtedness shall have been reduced during the next preceding fiscal year.

(3)

Gift or loan of credit regulated.—

No county, city or town, special district, or other unit of local government shall give or lend its credit in aid of any person, association, or corporation, except for public purposes as authorized by general law, and unless approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the unit who vote thereon.

(4)

Certain debts barred.—

No county, city or town, or other unit of local government shall assume or pay any debt or the interest thereon contracted directly or indirectly in aid or support of rebellion or insurrection against the United States.

(5)

Definitions.—

A debt is incurred within the meaning of this Section when a county, city or town, special district, or other unit, authority, or agency of local government borrows money. A pledge of faith and credit within the meaning of this Section is a pledge of the taxing power. A loan of credit within the meaning of this Section occurs when a county, city or town, special district, or other unit, authority, or agency of local government exchanges its obligations with or in any way guarantees the debts of an individual, association, or private corporation.

(6)

Outstanding debt.—

Except as provided in subsection (4), nothing in this Section shall be construed to invalidate or impair the obligation of any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness outstanding or authorized for issue as of July 1, 1973.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; 1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to limitations upon the increase of State debt, see N.C. Const., Art. V, § 3.

History Note.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section are similar to those of Art. V, § 4, Const. 1868, as amended in 1924 and 1936. The provisions of subsection (3) are similar to those of Art. VII, § 6, Const. 1868, as amended in 1948 and 1962. The provisions of subsection (4) are similar to those of Art. VII, § 9, Const. 1868, as amended in 1936 and 1962.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on “Necessary Expenses,” see 18 N.C.L. Rev. 93 (1940).

For note on “necessary expenses” of municipal corporations under this section, see 30 N.C.L. Rev. 313 (1952).

For note, “ ‘Necessary Expense’ Limitation — Four Recent Developments,” see 43 N.C.L. Rev. 372 (1965).

For comment on Vance County v. Royster,

271 N.C. 53

, 155 S.E.2d 790 (1967), cited in the note below, see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 188 (1967).

For note on taxation and revenue bonds to finance low-income housing, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 830 (1971).

For comment, “The States, Balanced Budgets, and Fundamental Shifts in Federalism,” see 82 N.C.L. Rev. 1195 (2004).

For comment, “ ‘Don’t Know What a Slide Rule Is For’: The Need for a Precise Definition of Public Purpose in North Carolina in the Wake of Kelo v. City of New London,” see 28 Campbell L. Rev. 291 (2006).

§ 5. Acts levying taxes to state objects.

Every act of the General Assembly levying a tax shall state the special object to which it is to be applied, and it shall be applied to no other purpose.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

This section is identical to Article V, § 8 of the Constitution of 1868. In 1873, Article V of the Constitution was amended and section 8 became section 7.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on taxation and revenue bonds to finance low-income housing, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 830 (1971).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1116 (1981).

For note on the rejection of the “public purpose” requirement for state tax exemption, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 293 (1981).

§ 6. Inviolability of sinking funds and retirement funds.

Sinking funds.— The General Assembly shall not use or authorize to be used any part of the amount of any sinking fund for any purpose other than the retirement of the bonds for which the sinking fund has been created, except that these funds may be invested as authorized by law.

Retirement funds.— Neither the General Assembly nor any public officer, employee, or agency shall use or authorize to be used any part of the funds of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System for any purpose other than retirement system benefits and purposes, administrative expenses, and refunds; except that retirement system funds may be invested as authorized by law, subject to the investment limitation that the funds of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System and the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System shall not be applied, diverted, loaned to, or used by the State, any State agency, State officer, public officer, or public employee.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 30, Const. 1868, as adopted in 1924, and the provisions of subsection (2) are similar to those of Art. II, § 31, Const. 1868, as adopted in 1950.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on taxation and revenue bonds to finance low-income housing, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 830 (1971).

§ 7. Drawing public money.

State treasury.— No money shall be drawn from the State treasury but in consequence of appropriations made by law, and an accurate account of the receipts and expenditures of State funds shall be published annually.

Local treasury.— No money shall be drawn from the treasury of any county, city or town, or other unit of local government except by authority of law.

History.

1969, c. 1200, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are similar to those of Art. XIV, § 3, Const. 1868. The provisions of subsection (2) are similar to those of Art. VII, § 7, Const. 1868, as amended in 1962.

§ 8. Health care facilities.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Constitution, the General Assembly may enact general laws to authorize the State, counties, cities or towns, and other State and local governmental entities to issue revenue bonds to finance or refinance for any such governmental entity or any nonprofit private corporation, regardless of any church or religious relationship, the cost of acquiring, constructing, and financing health care facility projects to be operated to serve and benefit the public; provided, no cost incurred earlier than two years prior to the effective date of this section shall be refinanced. Such bonds shall be payable from the revenues, gross or net, of any such projects and any other health care facilities of any such governmental entity or nonprofit private corporation pledged therefor; shall not be secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit, or deemed to create an indebtedness requiring voter approval of any governmental entity; and may be secured by an agreement which may provide for the conveyance of title of, with or without consideration, any such project or facilities to the governmental entity or nonprofit private corporation. The power of eminent domain shall not be used pursuant hereto for nonprofit private corporations.

History.

1975, c. 641, s. 1.

Defeated Amendment Proposal.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws, 1973, c. 1222, and defeated at the general election held on Nov. 5, 1974, would have added a new G.S. 8 to this Article, relating to bond issues to finance capital projects for industry.

§ 9. Capital projects for industry.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Constitution, the General Assembly may enact general laws to authorize counties to create authorities to issue revenue bonds to finance, but not to refinance, the cost of capital projects consisting of industrial, manufacturing and pollution control facilities for industry and pollution control facilities for public utilities, and to refund such bonds.

In no event shall such revenue bonds be secured by or payable from any public moneys whatsoever, but such revenue bonds shall be secured by and payable only from revenues or property derived from private parties. All such capital projects and all transactions therefor shall be subject to taxation to the extent such projects and transactions would be subject to taxation if no public body were involved therewith; provided, however, that the General Assembly may provide that the interest on such revenue bonds shall be exempt from income taxes within the State.

The power of eminent domain shall not be exercised to provide any property for any such capital project.

History.

1975, c. 826, s. 1.

§ 10. Joint ownership of generation and transmission facilities.

In addition to other powers conferred upon them by law, municipalities owning or operating facilities for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy and joint agencies formed by such municipalities for the purpose of owning or operating facilities for the generation and transmission of electric power and energy (each, respectively, “a unit of municipal government”) may jointly or severally own, operate and maintain works, plants and facilities, within or without the State, for the generation and transmission of electric power and energy, or both, with any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy for resale (each, respectively, “a co-owner”) within this State or any state contiguous to this State, and may enter into and carry out agreements with respect to such jointly owned facilities. For the purpose of financing its share of the cost of any such jointly owned electric generation or transmission facilities, a unit of municipal government may issue its revenue bonds in the manner prescribed by the General Assembly, payable as to both principal and interest solely from and secured by a lien and charge on all or any part of the revenue derived, or to be derived, by such unit of municipal government from the ownership and operation of its electric facilities; provided, however, that no unit of municipal government shall be liable, either jointly or severally, for any acts, omissions or obligations of any co-owner, nor shall any money or property of any unit of municipal government be credited or otherwise applied to the account of any co-owner or be charged with any debt, lien or mortgage as a result of any debt or obligation of any co-owner.

History.

1977, c. 528, s. 1.

§ 11. Capital projects for agriculture.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Constitution the General Assembly may enact general laws to authorize the creation of an agency to issue revenue bonds to finance the cost of capital projects consisting of agricultural facilities, and to refund such bonds.

In no event shall such revenue bonds be secured by or payable from any public moneys whatsoever, but such revenue bonds shall be secured by and payable only from revenues or property derived from private parties. All such capital projects and all transactions therefor shall be subject to taxation to the extent such projects and transactions would be subject to taxation if no public body were involved therewith; provided, however, that the General Assembly may provide that the interest on such revenue bonds shall be exempt from income taxes within the State.

The power of eminent domain shall not be exercised to provide any property for any such capital project.

History.

1983, c. 765, s. 1.

§ 12. Higher education facilities.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Constitution, the General Assembly may enact general laws to authorize the State or any State entity to issue revenue bonds to finance and refinance the cost of acquiring, constructing, and financing higher education facilities to be operated to serve and benefit the public for any nonprofit private corporation, regardless of any church or religious relationship provided no cost incurred earlier than five years prior to the effective date of this section shall be refinanced. Such bonds shall be payable from any revenues or assets of any such nonprofit private corporation pledged therefor, shall not be secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State or such State entity or deemed to create an indebtedness requiring voter approval of the State or such entity, and, where the title to such facilities is vested in the State or any State entity, may be secured by an agreement which may provide for the conveyance of title to, with or without consideration, such facilities to the nonprofit private corporation. The power of eminent domain shall not be used pursuant hereto.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 814.

Cross references.

For the Private Capital Facilities Finance Act, see

G.S. 159D-35

et seq.

§ 13. Seaport and airport facilities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Constitution, the General Assembly may enact general laws to grant to the State, counties, municipalities, and other State and local governmental entities all powers useful in connection with the development of new and existing seaports and airports, and to authorize such public bodies:

To acquire, construct, own, own jointly with public and private parties, lease as lessee, mortgage, sell, lease as lessor, or otherwise dispose of lands and facilities and improvements, including undivided interests therein;

To finance and refinance for public and private parties seaport and airport facilities and improvements which relate to, develop or further waterborne or airborne commerce and cargo and passenger traffic, including commercial, industrial, manufacturing, processing, mining, transportation, distribution, storage, marine, aviation and environmental facilities and improvements; and

To secure any such financing or refinancing by all or any portion of their revenues, income or assets or other available monies associated with any of their seaport or airport facilities and with the facilities and improvements to be financed or refinanced, and by foreclosable liens on all or any part of their properties associated with any of their seaport or airport facilities and with the facilities and improvements to be financed or refinanced, but in no event to create a debt secured by a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or any other public body in the State.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 933, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to specific powers of municipalities, see

G.S. 63-53

.

For the North Carolina Global TransPark Authority Act, see

G.S. 63A-1

et seq.

§ 14. Project development financing.

Notwithstanding Section 4 of this Article, the General Assembly may enact general laws authorizing any county, city, or town to define territorial areas in the county, city, or town and borrow money to be used to finance public improvements associated with private development projects within the territorial areas, as provided in this section. The General Assembly shall set forth by statute the method for determining the size of the territorial area and the issuing unit. This method is conclusive. When a territorial area is defined pursuant to this section, the county shall determine the current assessed value of taxable real and personal property in the territorial area. Thereafter, property in the territorial area continues to be subject to taxation to the same extent and in like manner as property not in the territorial area, but the net proceeds of taxes levied on the excess, if any, of the assessed value of taxable real and personal property in the territorial area at the time the taxes are levied over the assessed value of taxable real and personal property in the territorial area at the time the territorial area was defined may be set aside. The instruments of indebtedness authorized by this section shall be secured by these set-aside proceeds. The General Assembly may authorize a county, city, or town issuing these instruments of indebtedness to pledge, as additional security, revenues available to the issuing unit from sources other than the issuing unit’s exercise of its taxing power. As long as no revenues are pledged other than the set-aside proceeds authorized by this section and the revenues authorized in the preceding sentence, these instruments of indebtedness may be issued without approval by referendum. The county, city, or town may not pledge as security for these instruments of indebtedness any property tax revenues other than the set-aside proceeds authorized in this section, or in any other manner pledge its full faith and credit as security for these instruments of indebtedness unless a vote of the people is held as required by and in compliance with the requirements of Section 4 of this Article.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2 of this Article, the General Assembly may enact general laws authorizing a county, city, or town that has defined a territorial area pursuant to this section to assess property within the territorial area at a minimum value if agreed to by the owner of the property, which agreed minimum value shall be binding on the current owner and any future owners as long as the defined territorial area is in effect.

History.

2003-403, s. 1.

Defeated Amendment Proposal.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1993, c. 497, s. 1, and defeated at the election held November 2, 1993, would have added a new Section 14 relating to the authority of any county, city or town to borrow money, without the need of voter approval, and issue financing bonds to be used to finance public activities associated with private economic development projects.